Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Meetings and Action without Meetings

§ 17-19-701.
Annual and regular meetings.

A corporation with members shall hold a membership meeting annually at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

A corporation with members may hold regular membership meetings at the times stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

Annual and regular membership meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, annual and regular meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

At the annual meeting:

The president and chief financial officer shall report on the activities and financial condition of the corporation; and

The members shall consider and act upon such other matters as may be raised consistent with the notice requirements of W.S.

17-19-705

and 17-19-723(b).

At regular meetings the members shall consider and act upon such matters as may be raised consistent with the notice requirements of W.S.

17-19-705

and 17-19-723(b).

The failure to hold an annual or regular meeting at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporation’s bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate action.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Section 17-19-723(b), referred to in subsections (d)(ii) and (e), does not relate to notice, but to voting requirements.

§ 17-19-702.
Special meeting.

A corporation with members shall hold a special meeting of members:

On call of its board or the person or persons authorized to do so by the articles or bylaws; or

Except as provided in the articles or bylaws of a religious corporation if the holders of at least five percent (5%) of the voting power of any corporation sign, date, and deliver to any corporate officer one (1) or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held.

The close of business on the 30th day before delivery of the demand or demands for a special meeting to any corporate officer is the record date for the purpose of determining whether the five percent (5%) requirement of subsection (a) of this section has been met.

If a notice for a special meeting demanded under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section is not given pursuant to W.S.

17-19-705

within thirty (30) days after the date the written demand or demands are delivered to a corporate officer, regardless of the requirements of subsection (d) of this section, a person signing the demand or demands may set the time and place of the meeting and give notice pursuant to W.S.

17-19-705

.

Special meetings of members may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, special meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

Only those matters that are within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by W.S.

17-19-705

shall be conducted at a special meeting of members.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-703.
Court-ordered meeting.

The district court of the county where a corporation’s principal office or, if none in this state, its registered office is located may summarily order a meeting to be held:

On application of any member or other person entitled to participate in an annual or regular meeting, and in the case of a public benefit corporation, the attorney general, if an annual meeting was not held within fifteen (15) months after its last annual meeting;

On application of any member or other person entitled to participate in a regular meeting, and in the case of a public benefit corporation, the attorney general, if a regular meeting is not held within forty (40) days after the date it was required to be held; or

On application of a member who signed a demand for a special meeting valid under W.S.

17-19-702

, a person or persons entitled to call a special meeting and, in the case of a public benefit corporation, the attorney general, if:

Notice of the special meeting was not given within thirty (30) days after the date the demand was delivered to a corporate officer; or

The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, specify a record date for determining members entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters, and enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting.

If the court orders a meeting, it may also order the corporation to pay the member’s costs, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred to obtain the order.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-704.
Action by written consent.

Unless limited or prohibited by the articles or bylaws, action required or permitted by this act to be taken at a members’ meeting may be taken without a meeting if notice of the proposed action is given to all voting members and the action is approved by ninety percent (90%) of the members entitled to vote on the action. The action shall be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action approved, signed either manually or in facsimile, by the requisite number of members entitled to vote on the action, and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

If not otherwise determined under W.S.

17-19-703

or

17-19-707

, the record date for determining members entitled to take action without a meeting is the date the first member signs the consent under subsection (a) of this section.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document filed with the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-705.
Notice of meeting.

A corporation shall give notice consistent with its bylaws of meetings of members in a fair and reasonable manner.

Any notice that conforms to the requirements of subsection (c) of this section is fair and reasonable, but other means of giving notice may also be fair and reasonable when all the circumstances are considered; provided, however, that notice of matters referred to in paragraph (c)(ii) of this section shall be given as provided in subsection (c) of this section.

Notice is fair and reasonable if:

The corporation notifies its members of the place, date and time of each annual, regular and special meeting of members no fewer than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days before the meeting date;

Notice of an annual or regular meeting includes a description of any matter or matters that shall be approved by the members under W.S.

17-19-831

,

17-19-856

,

17-19-1003

,

17-19-1021

,

17-19-1104

,

17-19-1202

,

17-19-1401

or

17-19-1402

; and

Notice of a special meeting includes a description of the matter or matters for which the meeting is called.

Unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an annual, regular or special meeting of members is adjourned to a different date, time or place, notice need not be given of the new date, time or place, if the new date, time or place is announced at the meeting before adjournment. If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or shall be fixed under W.S.

17-19-707

, however, notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given under this section to the members of record as of the new record date.

When giving notice of an annual, regular or special meeting of members, a corporation shall give notice of a matter a member intends to raise at the meeting if:

Requested in writing to do so by a person entitled to call a special meeting; and

The request is received by the secretary or president of the corporation at least ten (10) days before the corporation gives notice of the meeting.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-706.
Waiver of notice.

A member may waive any notice required by this act, the articles, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. The waiver shall be in writing, be signed manually or in facsimile by the member entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

A member’s attendance at a meeting:

Waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the member at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting; and

Waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the member objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-707.
Record date; determining members entitled to notice and vote.

The bylaws of a corporation may fix or provide the manner of fixing a date as the record date for determining the members entitled to notice of a members’ meeting. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board may fix a future date as the record date. If no record date is fixed, members at the close of business on the business day preceding the day on which notice is given, or if notice is waived, at the close of business on the business day preceding the day on which the meeting is held, are entitled to notice of the meeting.

The bylaws of a corporation may fix or provide the manner of fixing a date as the record date for determining the members entitled to vote at a members’ meeting. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board may fix a future date as the record date. If no record date is fixed, members on the date of the meeting who are otherwise eligible to vote are entitled to vote at the meeting.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner for determining a date as the record date for the purpose of determining the members entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any other lawful action. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board may fix in advance a record date. If no record date is fixed, members at the close of business on the day on which the board adopts the resolution relating thereto, or the 60th day prior to the date of such other action, whichever is later, are entitled to exercise rights.

A record date fixed under this section shall not be more than seventy (70) days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of members occurs.

A determination of members entitled to notice of or to vote at a membership meeting is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board fixes a new date for determining the right to notice or the right to vote, which it shall do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than seventy (70) days after the record date for determining members entitled to notice of the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date for notice or voting continues in effect or it may fix a new record date for notice or voting.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Bylaws provide broad discretion in defining votes. —

District court properly granted summary judgment in association members' declaratory action seeking to set aside the amendment to the bylaws because a quorum was present and the amendment received two-thirds of the votes present at the meeting and under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 17-19-707(b), the association had broad discretion in defining in their bylaws the members entitled to vote. Mueller v. Zimmer, 2005 WY 156, 124 P.3d 340,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 2005).

§ 17-19-708.
Action by written ballot.

Unless prohibited or limited by the articles or bylaws, any action that may be taken at any annual, regular or special meeting of members may be taken without a meeting if the corporation delivers a written ballot to every member entitled to vote on the matter.

A written ballot shall:

Set forth each proposed action; and

Provide an opportunity to vote for or against each proposed action.

Approval by written ballot pursuant to this section shall be valid only when the number of votes cast by ballot equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action, and the number of approvals equals or exceeds the number of votes that would be required to approve the matter at a meeting at which the total number of votes cast was the same as the number of votes cast by ballot.

All solicitations for votes by written ballot shall:

Indicate the number of responses needed to meet the quorum requirements;

State the percentage of approvals necessary to approve each matter other than election of directors; and

Specify the time by which a ballot shall be received by the corporation in order to be counted.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, a written ballot shall not be revoked.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.